Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6724
Medication administration records.

A medication aide, a facility using a medication aide, a child care facility using the services of a person licensed to operate a child care facility or a staff member of a child care facility, or a school using the services of a staff member of the school shall keep and maintain accurate medication administration records. The medication administration records shall be available to the Department of Health and Human Services and the State Department of Education for inspection and copying. The medication administration records shall include information and data the departments require by rules and regulations adopted under the Medication Aide Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 664.